Washington statutes.
RCW 35.83.060

Procedure for exercising powers.

The exercise by a state public body of the powers herein granted may be authorized by resolution of the governing body of such state public body adopted by a majority of the members of its governing body present at a meeting of said governing body, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting at which such resolution is introduced. Such a resolution or resolutions shall take effect immediately and need not be laid over or published or posted.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.83.060. Prior: 1939 c 24 s 7; RRS s 6889-37. Formerly RCW 74.28.060.]